Hawaii statutes.
[§440E-28] Penalties. (a) Any
person in violation of this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant thereto shall
be fined not more than $5,000 for each violation. Each day's violation or
failure to comply shall be deemed a separate offense.

(b) In addition to the penalties provided in
this chapter, any person in violation of this chapter may be prohibited from
engaging in any mixed martial arts activities in the State for a period in
conformity with that set forth in section 92-17. [L 2007, c 279, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next